Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 12. Trust Advisors and Trust Protectors.

§ 91-8-1201.
Powers of trust advisors and trust protectors.

A trust protector or trust advisor is any person, and may be a committee of more than one (1) person, other than a trustee, who under the terms of the trust has a power or duty with respect to a trust, including, but not limited to, one or more of the following powers:

The power to modify or amend the trust instrument to achieve favorable tax status or respond to changes in any applicable federal, state, or other tax law affecting the trust, including, but not limited to, any rulings, regulations, or other guidance implementing or interpreting such laws;

The power to amend or modify the trust instrument to take advantage of changes in the rule against perpetuities, laws governing restraints on alienation, or other state laws restricting the terms of the trust, the distribution of trust property, or the administration of the trust;

The power to appoint a successor trust protector or trust advisor;

The power to review and approve a trustee’s trust reports or accountings;

The power to change the governing law or principal place of administration of the trust;

The power to remove and replace any trust advisor or trust protector for the reasons stated in the trust instrument;

The power to remove a trustee, cotrustee, or successor trustee, for the reasons stated in the trust instrument, and appoint a successor;

The power to consent to a trustee’s or cotrustee’s action or inaction in making distributions to beneficiaries;

The power to increase or decrease any interest of the beneficiaries in the trust, to grant a power of appointment to one or more trust beneficiaries, or to terminate or amend any power of appointment granted in the trust;

The power to perform a specific duty or function that would normally be required of a trustee or cotrustee;

The power to advise the trustee or cotrustee concerning any beneficiary;

The power to consent to a trustee’s or cotrustee’s action or inaction relating to investments of trust assets;

The power to direct the acquisition, disposition, or retention of any trust investment;

The power to terminate all or part of a trust;

The power to veto or direct all or part of any trust distribution;

The power to borrow money with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

The power to make loans out of trust property, including, but not limited to, loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions, including without interest, considered to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances;

The power to vote proxies and exercise all other rights of ownership relative to securities and business entities held by the trust;

The power to select one or more investment advisors, managers or counselors, including, but not limited to, a trustee, and delegate to them any of its powers;

The power to direct the trustee with respect to any additional powers and discretions over investment and management of trust assets provided in the trust instrument;

The power to receive notices, information, and reports otherwise required to be provided to a beneficiary under Section 91-8-813(a) and (b);

The power to represent and bind a beneficiary under Section 91-8-303(8) to the extent there is not material conflict of interest between the trust protector or trust advisor and the beneficiary; and

The power to designate someone to represent and bind a beneficiary under Section 91-8-303(8) to the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the person designated and the beneficiary.

The exercise of a power by a trust advisor or a trust protector shall be exercised in the sole and absolute discretion of the trust advisor or trust protector and shall be binding on all other persons.

Any power of a trust advisor or trust protector to directly or indirectly modify a trust may be granted notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 91-8-410 through 91-8-412 and 91-8-414.

An excluded fiduciary may continue to follow the direction of a trust protector or trust advisor upon the incapacity or death of the grantor of a trust to the extent provided in the trust instrument.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, no modification, amendment, or grant of a power of appointment with respect to a trust, all of whose beneficiaries are charitable organizations, may authorize a trust protector or trust advisor to grant a beneficial interest in the trust to any noncharitable interest or purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 98; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1202.
Trust advisors and trust protectors as fiduciaries.

A trust advisor or trust protector, other than a beneficiary, is a fiduciary with respect to each power granted to the trust advisor or trust protector. In exercising any power or refraining from exercising any power, a trust advisor or trust protector shall act in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

A trust advisor or trust protector is an excluded fiduciary with respect to each power granted or reserved exclusively to any one or more other trustees, trust advisors, or trust protectors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 99, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1203.
Trust advisor and trust protector subject to court jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment to serve as a trust advisor or trust protector, the trust advisor or the trust protector submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state even if investment advisory agreements or other related agreements provide otherwise, and the trust advisor or trust protector may be made a party to any action or proceeding relating to a decision, action, or inaction of the trust advisor or trust protector.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 100, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1204.
No duty to review actions of trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector.

Whenever, pursuant to the terms of a trust, an excluded fiduciary is to follow the direction of a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector with respect to investment decisions, distribution decisions, or other decisions of the nonexcluded fiduciary, then, except to the extent that the terms of the trust provide otherwise, the excluded fiduciary shall have no duty to:

Review, evaluate, perform investment reviews, suitability reviews, inquiries, or investigations, or in any other way monitor the conduct of the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector;

Make recommendations or evaluations or in any way provide advice to the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector or consult with the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector; or

Communicate with or warn or apprise any beneficiary or third party concerning instances in which the excluded fiduciary would or might have exercised the excluded fiduciary’s own discretion in a manner different from the manner directed by the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector.

Absent provisions in the trust instrument to the contrary, the actions of the excluded fiduciary pertaining to matters within the scope of the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector’s authority, including, but not limited to, confirming that the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector’s directions have been carried out and recording and reporting actions taken at the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector’s direction or other information pursuant to Section 91-8-813, shall be deemed to be administrative actions taken by the excluded fiduciary solely to allow the excluded fiduciary to perform those duties assigned to the excluded fiduciary under the terms of the trust; those administrative actions, as well as any communications made by the excluded fiduciary to the trust advisor, trust protector, or any of their agents or persons they have selected to provide services to the trust, shall not be deemed to constitute an undertaking by the excluded fiduciary to monitor the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector or otherwise participate in actions within the scope of the trustee’s, trust advisor’s, or trust protector’s authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 101, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1205.
Fiduciary’s liability for action or inaction of trustee, trust advisor, and trust protector.

An excluded fiduciary is not liable, either individually or as a fiduciary, for:

Any loss resulting from compliance with a direction of a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector, including, but not limited to, any loss from the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector breaching fiduciary responsibilities or acting beyond the trustee’s, trust advisor’s, or trust protector’s scope of authority;

Any loss resulting from any action or inaction of a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector; or

Any loss that results from the failure of a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector to take any action proposed by the excluded fiduciary where the action requires the authorization of the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector, if an excluded fiduciary who had a duty to propose the action timely sought but failed to obtain the authorization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1206.
Limitation of action against trust advisor or trust protector.

A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trust advisor or trust protector for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or the beneficiary’s representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (a) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trust advisor or trust protector for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the trust advisor or trust protector;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

A trustee may not commence a proceeding against a trust advisor or trust protector for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trustee or a representative of the trustee was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trustee or the trustee’s representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (d) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trustee against a trust advisor or trust protector for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the trust advisor or trust protector;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

A trust advisor or trust protector may not commence a proceeding against another trust advisor or another trust protector for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (g) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trust advisor or trust protector against another trust advisor or another trust protector for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the other trust advisor or other trust protector;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

Notwithstanding subsections (d) through (i), no trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector may commence a proceeding against a trust advisor or trust protector or another trust advisor or another trust protector if, under either subsections (a) through (c) or Section 91-8-1005(a) through (c), none of the beneficiaries may commence a proceeding against the trust advisor or trust protector for such breach of trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 103, eff from and after July 1, 2014.